New Jersey, session 221, A5909.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a. The Commissioner of Education shall establish a one-time grant program to support the implementation of free, full-day kindergarten programs in school districts that, at the time of application pursuant to subsection b. of this section, do not offer free, full-day kindergarten. b.  A school district that seeks to participate in the grant program shall submit for approval an application to the commissioner in a manner and form to be determined by the commissioner. The application shall, at a minimum, include a plan detailing how the district will implement the free, full-day kindergarten program and estimate the costs associated with the program. c. Contingent on the commissioners approval of a school districts application submitted pursuant to subsection b. of this section, grants shall, within the limit of funds appropriated pursuant to section 2 of this act, be evenly distributed to the following school districts: (1) Moorestown Township Public School District; (2) Haddonfield School District; (3) Metuchen Public School District; (4) Monroe Township School District; (5) Millstone Township School District; (6) School District of the Chathams; (7) Bridgewater-Raritan Regional School District; (8) Hillsborough Township Public School District; (9) Cranford Public School District; and (10) Westfield Public School District. 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $5,000,000 for the implementation of the grant program established pursuant to section 1 of this act. 3. This act shall take effect immediately.